Illinois, session 104th, SB3212.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Transit-Oriented Opportunity Retail Integration Zoning Act. 6    Section 5. Findings and purpose. 7    (a) The General Assembly finds that:8        (a) The State of Illinois has a compelling interest in 9    promoting efficient land use, economic development, 10    housing availability, reduced automobile dependency, and 11    equitable access to employment and services near public 12    transportation.13        (b) Transit-oriented development has been demonstrated 14    to increase economic activity, expand housing options, 15    reduce transportation costs for residents, and improve 16    environmental outcomes.17        (c) Inconsistent local zoning practices surrounding 18    transit-oriented developments frequently limit the full 19    economic and community benefits of public transportation 20    investments.21        (d) Establishing a uniform, by-right zoning framework 22    within a radius of transit-oriented developments will 23    advance statewide goals while preserving reasonable local   SB3212- 2 -LRB104 20176 RTM 33627 b1    regulatory authority over design, health, and safety.2    (b) The purpose of this Act is to create an automatic 3zoning overlay for land within one mile of a transit-oriented 4development, designated as an opportunity, retail, and 5innovation zone, to facilitate mixed-use, commercial, 6employment, and residential development in proximity to 7transit-oriented developments. 8    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    "One-mile radius" includes all land parcels, or portions 10thereof, located within one mile, measured horizontally, of a 11transit-oriented development.12    "Opportunity, retail, and innovation zoning" or "ORI zone" 13means a mixed-use zoning classification that permits, by 14right, commercial, retail, office, institutional, light and 15medium industrial, innovation, and residential uses, subject 16to the standards of this Act.17    "Transit-oriented development" means a fixed-route public 18transit facility, including but not limited to CTA rail 19stations, Metra commuter rail stations, Amtrak stations with 20local service, or fixed-guideway bus rapid transit stations. 21    Section 15. Automatic ORI zone.22    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the area 23located within a one-mile radius of a transit-oriented 24development is an ORI zone. All land located within an ORI zone   SB3212- 3 -LRB104 20176 RTM 33627 b1is subject to the provisions of the ORI zone.2    (b) The ORI zone is created automatically by operation of 3law and shall not require:4        (1) an amendment to a comprehensive plan;5        (2) a rezoning ordinance;6        (3) map amendment approval; or7        (4) discretionary legislative or administrative action 8    by a county or municipality.9    (c) If a conflict exists between the provisions of the ORI 10zone and a county or municipality, then the provisions of the 11ORI zone shall control. 12    Section 20. Permitted uses within an ORI zone. 13    (a) Within the ORI zone, the following uses shall be 14permitted by right:15        (1) retail, restaurant, and personal service 16    establishments;17        (2) office, professional, medical, and administrative 18    uses;19        (3) residential uses of all types, including 20    single-family, multifamily, and mixed-use residential;21        (4) light manufacturing, research and development, 22    storage warehousing, maker spaces, and innovation or 23    technology-oriented industrial uses that do not involve 24    heavy industrial processes;25        (5) institutional, educational, cultural, and   SB3212- 4 -LRB104 20176 RTM 33627 b1    governmental uses;2        (6) lodging and hospitality uses;3        (7) structured and accessory parking facilities; and4        (8) any other use substantially similar to those 5    listed in this Section.6    (b) Local zoning authorities may not require special use 7permits, variances, or planned development approvals for uses 8listed in this subsection (a). 9    Section 25. Development standards.10    (a) A county or a municipality may enforce objective 11development standards applicable within the ORI zone, 12including:13        (1) building height;14        (2) setbacks;15        (3) lot coverage;16        (4) floor-area ratio;17        (5) design and aesthetic standards; and18        (6) environmental and stormwater regulations.19    (b) The county's or municipality's standards shall be 20ministerial, objective, and uniformly applied, and shall not 21have the effect of prohibiting or unreasonably restricting 22development permitted under this Act.23    (c) Minimum off-street parking requirements within the ORI 24zone are prohibited, except where required for persons with 25disabilities under federal or State law.   SB3212- 5 -LRB104 20176 RTM 33627 b1    Section 30. Administrative approval.2    (a) Proposed developments within an ORI zone that comply 3with this Act and applicable objective standards shall be 4approved administratively.5    (b) Counties and municipalities shall issue all required 6zoning and building approvals within 90 days after receiving a 7complete application.8    (c) Failure to act within the time period specified in 9subsection (b) shall result the application being deemed 10approved. 11    Section 35. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate a 12real property in a manner inconsistent with this Section. This 13Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 of 14Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent 15exercise by home rule units of powers and functions exercised 16by the State. 17    Section 40. Relationship to existing law. Nothing in this 18Act shall be construed to:19    (1) limit the application of building, fire, life safety, 20or environmental codes;21    (2) affect historic preservation districts established 22under State or federal law, provided that the districts do not 23prohibit all economically viable use of property; or  SB3212- 6 -LRB104 20176 RTM 33627 b1    (3) impair existing collective bargaining agreements or 2labor standards. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 41, 2027.